src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/adj_umlaut_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Umlaut adjectives.

Tests: 
  Adjective - traeptsies: # ie-stamme
    traeptsies+A+Attr: traeptsies

  Adjective - saetnies: # ie-stamme
    saetnies+A+Attr: saetnies 
   
  Adjective - suvhtjies: # ie-stamme
    suvhtjies+A+Attr: suvhtjies

  Adjective - haerries: # ie-stamme
    haerries+A+Attr: haerries 
    
  Adjective - haeltjies: # ie-stamme
    haeltjies+A+Attr: haeltjies 
    
  Adjective - såebries: # ie-stamme
    såebries+A+Attr: såebries 
    
  Adjective - pliejhkies: # ie-stamme
    pliejhkies+A+Attr: pliejhkies 

  Adjective - gijmies: # 
    gijmies+A+Attr: gijmies

  Adjective - gæjmas: # 
    gæjmas+A+Attr: gæjmas
    
  Adjective - vilnjies: # ie-stamme
    vilnjies+A+Attr: vilnjies

  Adjective - njerries: # ie-stamme
    njerries+A+Attr: njerries
    
  Adjective - skiemtjies: # ie-stamme
    skiemtjies+A+Attr: skiemtjies

  Adjective - mujvies: # ie-stamme
    mujvies+A+Attr: mujvies

  Adjective - hujnies: # ie-stamme
    hujnies+A+Attr: hujnies
   
  Adjective - håjnoes: # oe-stamme
    håjnoes+A+Attr: håjnoes
 
  Adjective - hajnas: # a-stamme
    hajnas+A+Attr: hajnas

  Adjective - staeries: # 
    staeries+A+Attr: staeries
    
<<<<<<< HEAD:test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj_umlaut_gt-norm.yaml
  Adjective - gieries: # ie-stamme
    gieries+A+Attr: gieries
    gieries+A+Sg+Nom: gearehke
    gieries+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gearahkåbpoe,gearahgåbpoe, gearahgabpa, gearahtjabpa, gearahkabpa, gearahtjåbpoe]
    gieries+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gearahkommes, gearahgammes, gearahtjommes, gearahkammes, gearahtjammes, gearahgommes]

  Adjective - geehpes: # ie-stamme
    geehpes+A+Attr: geehpes
    geehpes+A+Sg+Nom: geehpes
    geehpes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [geehpesåbpoe, geehpesabpa]
    geehpes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [geehpesommes, geehpesammes]

  Adjective - sneehpes: # ie-stamme
    sneehpes+A+Attr: sneehpes
    sneehpes+A+Sg+Nom: sneehpes
    sneehpes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: sneehpebe
    sneehpes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: sneehpemes

  Adjective - rööpses: # ie-stamme - ruopsis - ruoksat 
    rööpses+A+Attr: [rööpses, reepses]
    rööpses+A+Sg+Nom: [rööpses, reepses, rååpsehke]
    rööpses+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [ruepsebe, rååpsehkåbpoe, rååpsehkabpa]
    rööpses+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [rööpsemes, rååpsehkommes, rååpsehkammes]

  Adjective - veelkes: # ie-stamme - vielkie
    veelkes+A+Attr: veelkes
    veelkes+A+Sg+Nom: veelkes
    veelkes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: vielkebe
    veelkes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: veelkemes
=======
#  Adjective - gieries: # ie-stamme
#   gieries+A+Attr: gieries
#   gieries+A+Sg+Nom: gearehke
#   gieries+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gearahkåbpoe,gearahgåbpoe, gearahgabpa, gearahtjabpa, gearahkabpa, gearahtjåbpoe]
#   gieries+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gearahkommes, gearahgammes, gearahtjommes, gearahkammes, gearahtjammes, gearahgommes]

#  Adjective - sneehpes: # ie-stamme
#    sneehpes+A+Attr: sneehpes
#    sneehpes+A+Sg+Nom: snååhpehke
#    sneehpes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [snååhpehkåbpoe, snååhpehkabpa]
#    sneehpes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [snååhpehkommes, snååhpehkammes]
>>>>>>> upstream/main:src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/adj_umlaut_gt-norm.yaml

  Adjective - kruana: # 
    kruana+A+Attr: kruana
    kruana+A+Sg+Nom: kruana
    kruana+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [kråanebe, kruenebe]
    kruana+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: kråanemes

#  Adjective - rïektes: # e-stamme - riektiedidh - ie -stamme
#    rïektes+Hom1+A+Attr: rïektes
#    rïektes+Hom1+A+Sg+Nom: reaktoe

#  Adjective - rïektes: # e-stamme - riektiedidh -ie-stamme
#    rïektes+Hom2+A+Attr: rïekte
#    rïektes+Hom2+A+Sg+Nom: rïektes


#   Adjective - rïekte: # ie-stamme - riektiedidh
#    rïekte+A+Attr: rïekte
#    rïekte+A+Sg+Nom: [rïektes, ryöktehke, rååktehke]

  Adjective - gabte: # ie-stamme - gebtie
    gabte+A+Attr: [gabte, gebties]
    gabte+A+Sg+Nom: [gabte, gabtege, gebtie] 
    gabte+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gabtebe, gabtegåbpoe, gebtebe, gabtegabpa]
    gabte+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gabtemes, gabtegommes, gebtemes, gabtegammes] 
    
  Adjective - gebties: # ie-stamme - gebtie
    gebties+A+Attr: gebties
    gebties+A+Sg+Nom: gebtie
    gebties+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gebtebe
    gebties+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gebtemes
    
  Adjective - gïsse: # ie-stamme
    gïsse+A+Attr: gïsse
    gïsse+A+Sg+Nom: [gïsse,gïssege]
    gïsse+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gïssebe, gissebe, gïssegåbpoe, gïssegabpa]
    gïsse+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gïssemes, gissemes, gïssegommes, gïssegammes] 

  Adjective - nåake: # ie-stamme -nåekies
    nåake+A+Attr: nåake
    nåake+A+Sg+Nom: nåake
    nåake+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [nåakebe, vïerrebe, vearrebe]
    nåake+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [nåakemes, vïerremes, vearremes, veerremes]

  Adjective - onne: # ie-stamme - unnie
    onne+A+Attr: onne
    onne+A+Sg+Nom: onne
    onne+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [onnebe, unnebe]
    onne+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [onnemes, unnemes]

  Adjective - stoere: # ie-stamme - stuerie
    stoere+A+Attr: [stoerre, stoere]
    stoere+A+Sg+Nom: [stoerre, stoere]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [stoerebe, stuerebe]
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [stoeremes, stööremes]

  Adjective - orre: # ie-stamme
    orre+A+Attr: orre
    orre+A+Sg+Nom: orre
    orre+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [urrebe, orrebe]
    orre+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [urremes, orremes]

  Adjective - hijven: # ie-stamme
    hijven+A+Attr: hijven
   
<<<<<<< HEAD:test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj_umlaut_gt-norm.yaml
#  Adjective - buerie: # ie-stamme
#    buerie+A+Attr: buerie
#    buerie+A+Sg+Nom: buerie
#    buerie+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: buerebe
#    buerie+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: bööremes
#    buerie+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [bueriebodtje, bueriebadtje]
#    buerie+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [bööretjabpa, bööretjåbpoe, buaratjåbpoe, buaratjabpa]
#    buerie+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [bööretjommes, buaratjommes, buaratjammes, bööretjammes]
=======
  Adjective - buerie: # ie-stamme
    buerie+A+Attr: buerie
    buerie+A+Sg+Nom: buerie
    buerie+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: buerebe
    buerie+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: bööremes
    buerie+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [bueriebodtje, bueriebadtje]
    buerie+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [bööretjabpa, bööretjåbpoe, buaratjåbpoe, buaratjabpa]
    buerie+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [bööretjommes, buaratjommes, buaratjammes, bööretjammes]
>>>>>>> upstream/main:src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/adj_umlaut_gt-norm.yaml

  Adjective - sööjmes: # ie-stamme
    sööjmes+A+Attr: [sööjmes, seejmes]
    sööjmes+A+Sg+Nom: [sööjmes, seejmes]
    sööjmes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [sööjmebe, seejmebe]
    sööjmes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [sööjmemes, seejmemes]

  Adjective - söökes: # ie-stamme - suekie
    söökes+A+Attr: söökes
    söökes+A+Sg+Nom: söökes
    söökes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: suekebe
    söökes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: söökemes 

  Adjective - plaave: # 
<<<<<<< HEAD:test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj_umlaut_gt-norm.yaml
    plaave+A+Attr: [plaave, plaaves]
    plaave+A+Sg+Nom: [plaaves, plaave]
    plaave+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [plaavebe, plaavesåbpoe, plaavesabpa]
    plaave+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [plaavemes, plaavesommes, plaavesammes]
=======
    plaave+A+Attr: [plaave]
    plaave+A+Sg+Nom: [plaaves]
    plaave+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [plaavesåbpoe, plaavesabpa]
    plaave+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [plaavesommes, plaavesammes]
>>>>>>> upstream/main:src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/adj_umlaut_gt-norm.yaml

  Adjective - smaave: # ie-stamme 
    smaave+A+Attr: smaave
    smaave+A+Sg+Nom: smaave
    smaave+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: smaavebe 
    smaave+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: smaavemes
   
